Hawaii statutes.
[§420D-10] Right of action. The
shareholders and directors of a sustainable business corporation shall have the
right to bring direct or derivative claims to enforce corporate purposes and
the standards for directors as set forth in section 414‑221(a) and shall
have the right to bring direct or derivative claims to enforce the general or
specific public benefit purposes of the sustainable business corporation and
the standard of conduct for directors pursuant to section 420D-6(a)(1). [L
2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next